Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1405.02
Initiative and referendum measures; public hearing; notice.

After the Secretary of State certifies the initiative and referendum measures for the ballot under subsection (3) of section 32-1411, the Secretary of State shall hold one public hearing in each congressional district for the purpose of allowing public comment on the measures. Notice of each hearing shall be published once in such newspapers as are necessary to provide for general circulation within the congressional district in which the meeting will be held not less than five days prior to the hearing. The hearings shall be held not more than eight weeks prior to the election.

Laws 1995, LB 337, § 8.